Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.015

Osteopathic physician health program—Content—License surcharge.

(1) To implement an osteopathic physician health program as authorized by RCW 18.130.175, the board shall enter into a contract with a physician health program or a voluntary substance use disorder monitoring program. The osteopathic physician health program may include any or all of the following:

(a) Contracting with providers of treatment programs;

(b) Receiving and evaluating reports of suspected impairment from any source;

(c) Intervening in cases of verified impairment;

(d) Referring impaired osteopathic physicians to treatment programs;

(e) Monitoring the treatment and rehabilitation of impaired osteopathic physicians including those ordered by the board;

(f) Providing education, prevention of impairment, posttreatment monitoring, and support of rehabilitated impaired osteopathic physicians; and

(g) Performing other related activities as determined by the board.

(2) A contract entered into under subsection (1) of this section shall be financed by a surcharge of $70 per year or equivalent on each license issuance or renewal to be collected by the department from every osteopathic physician licensed under this chapter. These moneys shall be placed in the health professions account to be used solely for the implementation of the osteopathic physician health program.

[ 2024 c 15 s 4; 2022 c 43 s 3; 2016 c 42 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2024 c 15: See note following RCW 18.71.310.